Illinois, session 104th, HB2502.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Findings and intent.5    (a) The General Assembly finds the following:6        (1) Public Act 99-456 prohibited schools from issuing 7    monetary fines or fees as a disciplinary consequence.8        (2) Public Act 100-810 prohibited schools from 9    referring truant minors to local public entities for the 10    purpose of issuing fines or fees as punishment for truancy 11    and required schools to document the provision of all 12    appropriate and available supportive services before 13    referring an individual having custody of a truant minor 14    to a local public entity.15        (3) Thousands of students have been referred to 16    municipalities for behaviors occurring on school grounds, 17    during school-related events, or while taking school 18    transportation.19        (4) Municipal tickets, citations, and ordinance 20    violations disproportionately impact students of color and 21    students with disabilities.22        (5) Municipal fines and fees associated with municipal 23    tickets, citations, and ordinance violations create 24    financial hardship for minors and their families.  HB2502- 2 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1        (6) Municipal proceedings do not provide minors with 2    sufficient due process, confidentiality, or record 3    expungement protections.4        (7) In accordance with federal law and regulations, 5    Illinois schools provide data to the Civil Rights Data 6    Collection required by the Office for Civil Rights of the 7    U.S. Department of Education, including data on referrals 8    to law enforcement, and which disaggregates referrals 9    resulting in arrests, but does not disaggregate referrals 10    resulting in a municipal ticket, citation, or ordinance 11    violation.12    (b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to learn more 13about the prevalence of student referrals to law enforcement, 14particularly those resulting in municipal tickets, citations, 15and ordinance violations for behaviors occurring on school 16grounds, during school-related events, or while taking school 17transportation. It is not the intent of the General Assembly 18to modify current school disciplinary responses provided in 19the School Code or responses to alleged delinquent or criminal 20conduct as set forth in the School Code, the Juvenile Court Act 21of 1987, or the Criminal Code of 2012. 22    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 232-3.206 and by changing Sections 10-20.14, 10-22.6, and 26-12 24as follows:   HB2502- 3 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)2    Sec. 2-3.206. Law enforcement referral report. 3    (a) As used in this Section, "referral to law enforcement" 4means an action by which a student is reported to a law 5enforcement agency or official, including a school police 6unit, for an incident that occurred on school grounds, during 7school-related events or activities (whether in-person or 8virtual), or while taking school transportation, regardless of 9whether official action is taken. "Referral to law 10enforcement" includes citations, tickets, court referrals, and 11school-related arrests.12    (b) The State Board of Education shall require that each 13school district annually report, in a manner and method 14determined by the State Board, the number of students in 15kindergarten through grade 12 who were referred to a law 16enforcement agency or official and the number of instances of 17referrals to law enforcement that students in grades 18kindergarten through 12 received. 19    (c) The data reported under subsection (b) shall be 20disaggregated by the result of the referral, such as a 21citation, ticket, court referral, or school-related arrest, 22incident type, race and ethnicity, sex, age, grade level, 23whether a student is an English learner, and disability. 24    (d) On or before January 31, 2027 and on or before January 2531 of each subsequent year, the State Board of Education, 26through the State Superintendent of Education, shall prepare a   HB2502- 4 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1report on student referrals to law enforcement in all school 2districts in this State, including State-authorized charter 3schools. This report shall include data from all public 4schools within school districts, including district-authorized 5charter schools. This report must be posted on the Internet 6website of the State Board of Education. The report shall 7include data reported under subsection (b) and shall be 8disaggregated according to subsection (c).  9    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.14)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-20.14)10    Sec. 10-20.14. Student discipline policies; parent-teacher 11advisory committee.12    (a) To establish and maintain a parent-teacher advisory 13committee to develop with the school board or governing body 14of a charter school policy guidelines on student discipline, 15including school searches and bullying prevention as set forth 16in Section 27-23.7 of this Code. School authorities shall 17furnish a copy of the policy to the parents or guardian of each 18student within 15 days after the beginning of the school year, 19or within 15 days after starting classes for a student who 20transfers into the district during the school year, and the 21school board or governing body of a charter school shall 22require that a school inform its students of the contents of 23the policy. School boards and the governing bodies of charter 24schools, along with the parent-teacher advisory committee, 25must annually review their student discipline policies and the   HB2502- 5 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1implementation of those policies and any other factors related 2to the safety of their schools, students, and school 3personnel.4    (a-5) On or before September 15, 2016, each elementary and 5secondary school and charter school shall, at a minimum, adopt 6student discipline policies that fulfill the requirements set 7forth in this Section, subsections (a) and (b) of Section 810-22.6 of this Code, Section 34-19 of this Code if 9applicable, and federal and State laws that provide special 10requirements for the discipline of students with disabilities. 11    (b) The parent-teacher advisory committee in cooperation 12with local law enforcement agencies shall develop, with the 13school board, policy guideline procedures to establish and 14maintain a reciprocal reporting system between the school 15district and local law enforcement agencies regarding criminal 16and civil offenses committed by students. School districts are 17encouraged to create memoranda of understanding with local law 18enforcement agencies that clearly define law enforcement's 19role in schools, in accordance with Sections 2-3.206 and 20Section 10-22.6 of this Code. In consultation with 21stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State Board of 22Education, the State Board of Education shall draft and 23publish guidance for the development of reciprocal reporting 24systems in accordance with this Section on or before July 1, 252025. 26    (c) The parent-teacher advisory committee, in cooperation   HB2502- 6 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1with school bus personnel, shall develop, with the school 2board, policy guideline procedures to establish and maintain 3school bus safety procedures. These procedures shall be 4incorporated into the district's student discipline policy. In 5consultation with stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State 6Board of Education, the State Board of Education shall draft 7and publish guidance for school bus safety procedures in 8accordance with this Section on or before July 1, 2025. 9    (d) As used in this subsection (d), "evidence-based 10intervention" means intervention that has demonstrated a 11statistically significant effect on improving student outcomes 12as documented in peer-reviewed scholarly journals. 13    The school board, in consultation with the parent-teacher 14advisory committee and other community-based organizations, 15must include provisions in the student discipline policy to 16address students who have demonstrated behaviors that put them 17at risk for aggressive behavior, including without limitation 18bullying, as defined in the policy. These provisions must 19include procedures for notifying parents or legal guardians 20and intervention procedures based upon available 21community-based and district resources. 22    In consultation with behavioral health experts, the State 23Board of Education shall draft and publish guidance for 24evidence-based intervention procedures, including examples, in 25accordance with this Section on or before July 1, 2025. 26(Source: P.A. 103-896, eff. 8-9-24.)   HB2502- 7 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.6)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-22.6)2    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 102-466)3    Sec. 10-22.6. Suspension or expulsion of students; school 4searches. 5    (a) To expel students guilty of gross disobedience or 6misconduct, including gross disobedience or misconduct 7perpetuated by electronic means, pursuant to subsection (b-20) 8of this Section, and no action shall lie against them for such 9expulsion. Expulsion shall take place only after the parents 10have been requested to appear at a meeting of the board, or 11with a hearing officer appointed by it, to discuss their 12child's behavior. Such request shall be made by registered or 13certified mail and shall state the time, place and purpose of 14the meeting. The board, or a hearing officer appointed by it, 15at such meeting shall state the reasons for dismissal and the 16date on which the expulsion is to become effective. If a 17hearing officer is appointed by the board, the hearing officer 18shall report to the board a written summary of the evidence 19heard at the meeting and the board may take such action thereon 20as it finds appropriate. If the board acts to expel a student, 21the written expulsion decision shall detail the specific 22reasons why removing the student from the learning environment 23is in the best interest of the school. The expulsion decision 24shall also include a rationale as to the specific duration of 25the expulsion. An expelled student may be immediately   HB2502- 8 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1transferred to an alternative program in the manner provided 2in Article 13A or 13B of this Code. A student must not be 3denied transfer because of the expulsion, except in cases in 4which such transfer is deemed to cause a threat to the safety 5of students or staff in the alternative program. 6    (b) To suspend or by policy to authorize the 7superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 8principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend 9students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct, or to 10suspend students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct on 11the school bus from riding the school bus, pursuant to 12subsections (b-15) and (b-20) of this Section, and no action 13shall lie against them for such suspension. The board may by 14policy authorize the superintendent of the district or the 15principal, assistant principal, or dean of students of any 16school to suspend students guilty of such acts for a period not 17to exceed 10 school days. If a student is suspended due to 18gross disobedience or misconduct on a school bus, the board 19may suspend the student in excess of 10 school days for safety 20reasons. 21    Any suspension shall be reported immediately to the 22parents or guardian of a student along with a full statement of 23the reasons for such suspension and a notice of their right to 24a review. The school board must be given a summary of the 25notice, including the reason for the suspension and the 26suspension length. Upon request of the parents or guardian,   HB2502- 9 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1the school board or a hearing officer appointed by it shall 2review such action of the superintendent or principal, 3assistant principal, or dean of students. At such review, the 4parents or guardian of the student may appear and discuss the 5suspension with the board or its hearing officer. If a hearing 6officer is appointed by the board, he shall report to the board 7a written summary of the evidence heard at the meeting. After 8its hearing or upon receipt of the written report of its 9hearing officer, the board may take such action as it finds 10appropriate. If a student is suspended pursuant to this 11subsection (b), the board shall, in the written suspension 12decision, detail the specific act of gross disobedience or 13misconduct resulting in the decision to suspend. The 14suspension decision shall also include a rationale as to the 15specific duration of the suspension.16    (b-5) Among the many possible disciplinary interventions 17and consequences available to school officials, school 18exclusions, such as out-of-school suspensions and expulsions, 19are the most serious. School officials shall limit the number 20and duration of expulsions and suspensions to the greatest 21extent practicable, and it is recommended that they use them 22only for legitimate educational purposes. To ensure that 23students are not excluded from school unnecessarily, it is 24recommended that school officials consider forms of 25non-exclusionary discipline prior to using out-of-school 26suspensions or expulsions.   HB2502- 10 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1    (b-10) Unless otherwise required by federal law or this 2Code, school boards may not institute zero-tolerance policies 3by which school administrators are required to suspend or 4expel students for particular behaviors.5    (b-15) Out-of-school suspensions of 3 days or less may be 6used only if the student's continuing presence in school would 7pose a threat to school safety or a disruption to other 8students' learning opportunities. For purposes of this 9subsection (b-15), "threat to school safety or a disruption to 10other students' learning opportunities" shall be determined on 11a case-by-case basis by the school board or its designee. 12School officials shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve 13such threats, address such disruptions, and minimize the 14length of suspensions to the greatest extent practicable.15    (b-20) Unless otherwise required by this Code, 16out-of-school suspensions of longer than 3 days, expulsions, 17and disciplinary removals to alternative schools may be used 18only if other appropriate and available behavioral and 19disciplinary interventions have been exhausted and the 20student's continuing presence in school would either (i) pose 21a threat to the safety of other students, staff, or members of 22the school community or (ii) substantially disrupt, impede, or 23interfere with the operation of the school. For purposes of 24this subsection (b-20), "threat to the safety of other 25students, staff, or members of the school community" and 26"substantially disrupt, impede, or interfere with the   HB2502- 11 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1operation of the school" shall be determined on a case-by-case 2basis by school officials. For purposes of this subsection 3(b-20), the determination of whether "appropriate and 4available behavioral and disciplinary interventions have been 5exhausted" shall be made by school officials. School officials 6shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve such threats, 7address such disruptions, and minimize the length of student 8exclusions to the greatest extent practicable. Within the 9suspension decision described in subsection (b) of this 10Section or the expulsion decision described in subsection (a) 11of this Section, it shall be documented whether other 12interventions were attempted or whether it was determined that 13there were no other appropriate and available interventions.14    (b-25) Students who are suspended out-of-school for longer 15than 3 school days shall be provided appropriate and available 16support services during the period of their suspension. For 17purposes of this subsection (b-25), "appropriate and available 18support services" shall be determined by school authorities. 19Within the suspension decision described in subsection (b) of 20this Section, it shall be documented whether such services are 21to be provided or whether it was determined that there are no 22such appropriate and available services. 23    A school district may refer students who are expelled to 24appropriate and available support services.25    A school district shall create a policy to facilitate the 26re-engagement of students who are suspended out-of-school,   HB2502- 12 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1expelled, or returning from an alternative school setting. In 2consultation with stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State 3Board of Education, the State Board of Education shall draft 4and publish guidance for the re-engagement of students who are 5suspended out-of-school, expelled, or returning from an 6alternative school setting in accordance with this Section and 7Section 13A-4 on or before July 1, 2025. 8    (b-30) A school district shall create a policy by which 9suspended students, including those students suspended from 10the school bus who do not have alternate transportation to 11school, shall have the opportunity to make up work for 12equivalent academic credit. It shall be the responsibility of 13a student's parent or guardian to notify school officials that 14a student suspended from the school bus does not have 15alternate transportation to school. 16    (c) A school board must invite a representative from a 17local mental health agency to consult with the board at the 18meeting whenever there is evidence that mental illness may be 19the cause of a student's expulsion or suspension.20    (c-5) School districts shall make reasonable efforts to 21provide ongoing professional development to all school 22personnel, school board members, and school resource officers, 23on the requirements of this Section and Section 10-20.14, the 24adverse consequences of school exclusion and justice-system 25involvement, effective classroom management strategies, 26culturally responsive discipline, trauma-responsive learning   HB2502- 13 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1environments, as defined in subsection (b) of Section 3-11, 2the appropriate and available supportive services for the 3promotion of student attendance and engagement, and 4developmentally appropriate disciplinary methods that promote 5positive and healthy school climates. 6    (d) The board may expel a student for a definite period of 7time not to exceed 2 calendar years, as determined on a 8case-by-case basis. A student who is determined to have 9brought one of the following objects to school, any 10school-sponsored activity or event, or any activity or event 11that bears a reasonable relationship to school shall be 12expelled for a period of not less than one year:13        (1) A firearm. For the purposes of this Section, 14    "firearm" means any gun, rifle, shotgun, weapon as defined 15    by Section 921 of Title 18 of the United States Code, 16    firearm as defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 17    Identification Card Act, or firearm as defined in Section 18    24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. The expulsion period 19    under this subdivision (1) may be modified by the 20    superintendent, and the superintendent's determination may 21    be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis.22        (2) A knife, brass knuckles or other knuckle weapon 23    regardless of its composition, a billy club, or any other 24    object if used or attempted to be used to cause bodily 25    harm, including "look alikes" of any firearm as defined in 26    subdivision (1) of this subsection (d). The expulsion   HB2502- 14 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1    requirement under this subdivision (2) may be modified by 2    the superintendent, and the superintendent's determination 3    may be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis. 4Expulsion or suspension shall be construed in a manner 5consistent with the federal Individuals with Disabilities 6Education Act. A student who is subject to suspension or 7expulsion as provided in this Section may be eligible for a 8transfer to an alternative school program in accordance with 9Article 13A of the School Code.10    (d-5) The board may suspend or by regulation authorize the 11superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 12principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend a 13student for a period not to exceed 10 school days or may expel 14a student for a definite period of time not to exceed 2 15calendar years, as determined on a case-by-case basis, if (i) 16that student has been determined to have made an explicit 17threat on an Internet website against a school employee, a 18student, or any school-related personnel, (ii) the Internet 19website through which the threat was made is a site that was 20accessible within the school at the time the threat was made or 21was available to third parties who worked or studied within 22the school grounds at the time the threat was made, and (iii) 23the threat could be reasonably interpreted as threatening to 24the safety and security of the threatened individual because 25of the individual's duties or employment status or status as a 26student inside the school.   HB2502- 15 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1    (e) To maintain order and security in the schools, school 2authorities may inspect and search places and areas such as 3lockers, desks, parking lots, and other school property and 4equipment owned or controlled by the school, as well as 5personal effects left in those places and areas by students, 6without notice to or the consent of the student, and without a 7search warrant. As a matter of public policy, the General 8Assembly finds that students have no reasonable expectation of 9privacy in these places and areas or in their personal effects 10left in these places and areas. School authorities may request 11the assistance of law enforcement officials for the purpose of 12conducting inspections and searches of lockers, desks, parking 13lots, and other school property and equipment owned or 14controlled by the school for illegal drugs, weapons, or other 15illegal or dangerous substances or materials, including 16searches conducted through the use of specially trained dogs. 17If a search conducted in accordance with this Section produces 18evidence that the student has violated or is violating either 19the law, local ordinance, or the school's policies or rules, 20such evidence may be seized by school authorities, and 21disciplinary action may be taken. School authorities may also 22turn over such evidence to law enforcement authorities.23    (f) Suspension or expulsion may include suspension or 24expulsion from school and all school activities and a 25prohibition from being present on school grounds.26    (g) A school district may adopt a policy providing that if   HB2502- 16 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1a student is suspended or expelled for any reason from any 2public or private school in this or any other state, the 3student must complete the entire term of the suspension or 4expulsion in an alternative school program under Article 13A 5of this Code or an alternative learning opportunities program 6under Article 13B of this Code before being admitted into the 7school district if there is no threat to the safety of students 8or staff in the alternative program.9    (h) School officials shall not advise or encourage 10students to drop out voluntarily due to behavioral or academic 11difficulties.12    (i) In this subsection (i):13    "Municipal code violation" means the violation of a rule 14or regulation established by a local government authority, 15authorized by Section 1-2-1 of the Illinois Municipal Code.16    "School personnel" means a person who is employed by, who 17is on contract with, or who volunteers in a school district or 18charter school, including, but not limited to, a school 19administrator, school district administrator, teacher, school 20social worker, school counselor, school psychologist, school 21nurse, paraprofessional, speech-language pathologist, 22cafeteria worker, custodian, bus driver, school resource 23officer, or security guard.24    School personnel may not issue A student may not be issued 25a monetary fine, or fee, ticket, or citation for a municipal 26code violation as a disciplinary consequence, though this   HB2502- 17 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1shall not preclude requiring a student to provide restitution 2for lost, stolen, or damaged property. This subsection (i) 3does not modify school disciplinary responses under this 4Section or Section 10-20.14 of this Code that existed before 5the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 6Assembly or responses to alleged delinquent or criminal 7conduct set forth in this Code, Article V of the Juvenile Court 8Act of 1987, or the Criminal Code of 2012. 9    (j) Subsections (a) through (i) of this Section shall 10apply to elementary and secondary schools, charter schools, 11special charter districts, and school districts organized 12under Article 34 of this Code. 13    (k) The expulsion of students enrolled in programs funded 14under Section 1C-2 of this Code is subject to the requirements 15under paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 2-3.71 of 16this Code.17    (l) An in-school suspension program provided by a school 18district for any students in kindergarten through grade 12 may 19focus on promoting non-violent conflict resolution and 20positive interaction with other students and school personnel. 21A school district may employ a school social worker or a 22licensed mental health professional to oversee an in-school 23suspension program in kindergarten through grade 12. 24(Source: P.A. 102-539, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 25103-594, eff. 6-25-24; 103-896, eff. 8-9-24; revised 9-25-24.)   HB2502- 18 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 102-466)2    Sec. 10-22.6. Suspension or expulsion of students; school 3searches. 4    (a) To expel students guilty of gross disobedience or 5misconduct, including gross disobedience or misconduct 6perpetuated by electronic means, pursuant to subsection (b-20) 7of this Section, and no action shall lie against them for such 8expulsion. Expulsion shall take place only after the parents 9or guardians have been requested to appear at a meeting of the 10board, or with a hearing officer appointed by it, to discuss 11their child's behavior. Such request shall be made by 12registered or certified mail and shall state the time, place 13and purpose of the meeting. The board, or a hearing officer 14appointed by it, at such meeting shall state the reasons for 15dismissal and the date on which the expulsion is to become 16effective. If a hearing officer is appointed by the board, the 17hearing officer shall report to the board a written summary of 18the evidence heard at the meeting and the board may take such 19action thereon as it finds appropriate. If the board acts to 20expel a student, the written expulsion decision shall detail 21the specific reasons why removing the student from the 22learning environment is in the best interest of the school. 23The expulsion decision shall also include a rationale as to 24the specific duration of the expulsion. An expelled student 25may be immediately transferred to an alternative program in 26the manner provided in Article 13A or 13B of this Code. A   HB2502- 19 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1student must not be denied transfer because of the expulsion, 2except in cases in which such transfer is deemed to cause a 3threat to the safety of students or staff in the alternative 4program. 5    (b) To suspend or by policy to authorize the 6superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 7principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend 8students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct, or to 9suspend students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct on 10the school bus from riding the school bus, pursuant to 11subsections (b-15) and (b-20) of this Section, and no action 12shall lie against them for such suspension. The board may by 13policy authorize the superintendent of the district or the 14principal, assistant principal, or dean of students of any 15school to suspend students guilty of such acts for a period not 16to exceed 10 school days. If a student is suspended due to 17gross disobedience or misconduct on a school bus, the board 18may suspend the student in excess of 10 school days for safety 19reasons. 20    Any suspension shall be reported immediately to the 21parents or guardians of a student along with a full statement 22of the reasons for such suspension and a notice of their right 23to a review. The school board must be given a summary of the 24notice, including the reason for the suspension and the 25suspension length. Upon request of the parents or guardians, 26the school board or a hearing officer appointed by it shall   HB2502- 20 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1review such action of the superintendent or principal, 2assistant principal, or dean of students. At such review, the 3parents or guardians of the student may appear and discuss the 4suspension with the board or its hearing officer. If a hearing 5officer is appointed by the board, he shall report to the board 6a written summary of the evidence heard at the meeting. After 7its hearing or upon receipt of the written report of its 8hearing officer, the board may take such action as it finds 9appropriate. If a student is suspended pursuant to this 10subsection (b), the board shall, in the written suspension 11decision, detail the specific act of gross disobedience or 12misconduct resulting in the decision to suspend. The 13suspension decision shall also include a rationale as to the 14specific duration of the suspension.15    (b-5) Among the many possible disciplinary interventions 16and consequences available to school officials, school 17exclusions, such as out-of-school suspensions and expulsions, 18are the most serious. School officials shall limit the number 19and duration of expulsions and suspensions to the greatest 20extent practicable, and it is recommended that they use them 21only for legitimate educational purposes. To ensure that 22students are not excluded from school unnecessarily, it is 23recommended that school officials consider forms of 24non-exclusionary discipline prior to using out-of-school 25suspensions or expulsions. 26    (b-10) Unless otherwise required by federal law or this   HB2502- 21 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1Code, school boards may not institute zero-tolerance policies 2by which school administrators are required to suspend or 3expel students for particular behaviors.4    (b-15) Out-of-school suspensions of 3 days or less may be 5used only if the student's continuing presence in school would 6pose a threat to school safety or a disruption to other 7students' learning opportunities. For purposes of this 8subsection (b-15), "threat to school safety or a disruption to 9other students' learning opportunities" shall be determined on 10a case-by-case basis by the school board or its designee. 11School officials shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve 12such threats, address such disruptions, and minimize the 13length of suspensions to the greatest extent practicable.14    (b-20) Unless otherwise required by this Code, 15out-of-school suspensions of longer than 3 days, expulsions, 16and disciplinary removals to alternative schools may be used 17only if other appropriate and available behavioral and 18disciplinary interventions have been exhausted and the 19student's continuing presence in school would either (i) pose 20a threat to the safety of other students, staff, or members of 21the school community or (ii) substantially disrupt, impede, or 22interfere with the operation of the school. For purposes of 23this subsection (b-20), "threat to the safety of other 24students, staff, or members of the school community" and 25"substantially disrupt, impede, or interfere with the 26operation of the school" shall be determined on a case-by-case   HB2502- 22 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1basis by school officials. For purposes of this subsection 2(b-20), the determination of whether "appropriate and 3available behavioral and disciplinary interventions have been 4exhausted" shall be made by school officials. School officials 5shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve such threats, 6address such disruptions, and minimize the length of student 7exclusions to the greatest extent practicable. Within the 8suspension decision described in subsection (b) of this 9Section or the expulsion decision described in subsection (a) 10of this Section, it shall be documented whether other 11interventions were attempted or whether it was determined that 12there were no other appropriate and available interventions.13    (b-25) Students who are suspended out-of-school for longer 14than 3 school days shall be provided appropriate and available 15support services during the period of their suspension. For 16purposes of this subsection (b-25), "appropriate and available 17support services" shall be determined by school authorities. 18Within the suspension decision described in subsection (b) of 19this Section, it shall be documented whether such services are 20to be provided or whether it was determined that there are no 21such appropriate and available services. 22    A school district may refer students who are expelled to 23appropriate and available support services.24    A school district shall create a policy to facilitate the 25re-engagement of students who are suspended out-of-school, 26expelled, or returning from an alternative school setting. In   HB2502- 23 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1consultation with stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State 2Board of Education, the State Board of Education shall draft 3and publish guidance for the re-engagement of students who are 4suspended out-of-school, expelled, or returning from an 5alternative school setting in accordance with this Section and 6Section 13A-4 on or before July 1, 2025. 7    (b-30) A school district shall create a policy by which 8suspended students, including those students suspended from 9the school bus who do not have alternate transportation to 10school, shall have the opportunity to make up work for 11equivalent academic credit. It shall be the responsibility of 12a student's parents or guardians to notify school officials 13that a student suspended from the school bus does not have 14alternate transportation to school. 15    (b-35) In all suspension review hearings conducted under 16subsection (b) or expulsion hearings conducted under 17subsection (a), a student may disclose any factor to be 18considered in mitigation, including his or her status as a 19parent, expectant parent, or victim of domestic or sexual 20violence, as defined in Article 26A. A representative of the 21parent's or guardian's choice, or of the student's choice if 22emancipated, must be permitted to represent the student 23throughout the proceedings and to address the school board or 24its appointed hearing officer. With the approval of the 25student's parent or guardian, or of the student if 26emancipated, a support person must be permitted to accompany   HB2502- 24 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1the student to any disciplinary hearings or proceedings. The 2representative or support person must comply with any rules of 3the school district's hearing process. If the representative 4or support person violates the rules or engages in behavior or 5advocacy that harasses, abuses, or intimidates either party, a 6witness, or anyone else in attendance at the hearing, the 7representative or support person may be prohibited from 8further participation in the hearing or proceeding. A 9suspension or expulsion proceeding under this subsection 10(b-35) must be conducted independently from any ongoing 11criminal investigation or proceeding, and an absence of 12pending or possible criminal charges, criminal investigations, 13or proceedings may not be a factor in school disciplinary 14decisions.15    (b-40) During a suspension review hearing conducted under 16subsection (b) or an expulsion hearing conducted under 17subsection (a) that involves allegations of sexual violence by 18the student who is subject to discipline, neither the student 19nor his or her representative shall directly question nor have 20direct contact with the alleged victim. The student who is 21subject to discipline or his or her representative may, at the 22discretion and direction of the school board or its appointed 23hearing officer, suggest questions to be posed by the school 24board or its appointed hearing officer to the alleged victim. 25    (c) A school board must invite a representative from a 26local mental health agency to consult with the board at the   HB2502- 25 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1meeting whenever there is evidence that mental illness may be 2the cause of a student's expulsion or suspension.3    (c-5) School districts shall make reasonable efforts to 4provide ongoing professional development to all school 5personnel, school board members, and school resource officers 6on the requirements of this Section and Section 10-20.14, the 7adverse consequences of school exclusion and justice-system 8involvement, effective classroom management strategies, 9culturally responsive discipline, trauma-responsive learning 10environments, as defined in subsection (b) of Section 3-11, 11the appropriate and available supportive services for the 12promotion of student attendance and engagement, and 13developmentally appropriate disciplinary methods that promote 14positive and healthy school climates. 15    (d) The board may expel a student for a definite period of 16time not to exceed 2 calendar years, as determined on a 17case-by-case basis. A student who is determined to have 18brought one of the following objects to school, any 19school-sponsored activity or event, or any activity or event 20that bears a reasonable relationship to school shall be 21expelled for a period of not less than one year:22        (1) A firearm. For the purposes of this Section, 23    "firearm" means any gun, rifle, shotgun, weapon as defined 24    by Section 921 of Title 18 of the United States Code, 25    firearm as defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 26    Identification Card Act, or firearm as defined in Section   HB2502- 26 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1    24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. The expulsion period 2    under this subdivision (1) may be modified by the 3    superintendent, and the superintendent's determination may 4    be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis.5        (2) A knife, brass knuckles or other knuckle weapon 6    regardless of its composition, a billy club, or any other 7    object if used or attempted to be used to cause bodily 8    harm, including "look alikes" of any firearm as defined in 9    subdivision (1) of this subsection (d). The expulsion 10    requirement under this subdivision (2) may be modified by 11    the superintendent, and the superintendent's determination 12    may be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis. 13Expulsion or suspension shall be construed in a manner 14consistent with the federal Individuals with Disabilities 15Education Act. A student who is subject to suspension or 16expulsion as provided in this Section may be eligible for a 17transfer to an alternative school program in accordance with 18Article 13A of the School Code.19    (d-5) The board may suspend or by regulation authorize the 20superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 21principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend a 22student for a period not to exceed 10 school days or may expel 23a student for a definite period of time not to exceed 2 24calendar years, as determined on a case-by-case basis, if (i) 25that student has been determined to have made an explicit 26threat on an Internet website against a school employee, a   HB2502- 27 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1student, or any school-related personnel, (ii) the Internet 2website through which the threat was made is a site that was 3accessible within the school at the time the threat was made or 4was available to third parties who worked or studied within 5the school grounds at the time the threat was made, and (iii) 6the threat could be reasonably interpreted as threatening to 7the safety and security of the threatened individual because 8of the individual's duties or employment status or status as a 9student inside the school. 10    (e) To maintain order and security in the schools, school 11authorities may inspect and search places and areas such as 12lockers, desks, parking lots, and other school property and 13equipment owned or controlled by the school, as well as 14personal effects left in those places and areas by students, 15without notice to or the consent of the student, and without a 16search warrant. As a matter of public policy, the General 17Assembly finds that students have no reasonable expectation of 18privacy in these places and areas or in their personal effects 19left in these places and areas. School authorities may request 20the assistance of law enforcement officials for the purpose of 21conducting inspections and searches of lockers, desks, parking 22lots, and other school property and equipment owned or 23controlled by the school for illegal drugs, weapons, or other 24illegal or dangerous substances or materials, including 25searches conducted through the use of specially trained dogs. 26If a search conducted in accordance with this Section produces   HB2502- 28 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1evidence that the student has violated or is violating either 2the law, local ordinance, or the school's policies or rules, 3such evidence may be seized by school authorities, and 4disciplinary action may be taken. School authorities may also 5turn over such evidence to law enforcement authorities.6    (f) Suspension or expulsion may include suspension or 7expulsion from school and all school activities and a 8prohibition from being present on school grounds.9    (g) A school district may adopt a policy providing that if 10a student is suspended or expelled for any reason from any 11public or private school in this or any other state, the 12student must complete the entire term of the suspension or 13expulsion in an alternative school program under Article 13A 14of this Code or an alternative learning opportunities program 15under Article 13B of this Code before being admitted into the 16school district if there is no threat to the safety of students 17or staff in the alternative program. A school district that 18adopts a policy under this subsection (g) must include a 19provision allowing for consideration of any mitigating 20factors, including, but not limited to, a student's status as 21a parent, expectant parent, or victim of domestic or sexual 22violence, as defined in Article 26A. 23    (h) School officials shall not advise or encourage 24students to drop out voluntarily due to behavioral or academic 25difficulties.26    (i) In this subsection (i):  HB2502- 29 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1    "Municipal code violation" means the violation of a rule 2or regulation established by a local government authority, 3authorized by Section 1-2-1 of the Illinois Municipal Code.4    "School personnel" means a person who is employed by, who 5is on contract with, or who volunteers in a school district or 6charter school, including, but not limited to, a school 7administrator, school district administrator, teacher, school 8social worker, school counselor, school psychologist, school 9nurse, paraprofessional, speech-language pathologist, 10cafeteria worker, custodian, bus driver, school resource 11officer, or security guard.12    School personnel may not issue A student may not be issued 13a monetary fine, or fee, ticket, or citation for a municipal 14code violation as a disciplinary consequence, though this 15shall not preclude requiring a student to provide restitution 16for lost, stolen, or damaged property. This subsection (i) 17does not modify school disciplinary responses under this 18Section or Section 10-20.14 of this Code that existed before 19the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 20Assembly or responses to alleged delinquent or criminal 21conduct set forth in this Code, Article V of the Juvenile Court 22Act of 1987, or the Criminal Code of 2012. 23    (j) Subsections (a) through (i) of this Section shall 24apply to elementary and secondary schools, charter schools, 25special charter districts, and school districts organized 26under Article 34 of this Code.   HB2502- 30 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1    (k) Through June 30, 2026, the expulsion of students 2enrolled in programs funded under Section 1C-2 of this Code is 3subject to the requirements under paragraph (7) of subsection 4(a) of Section 2-3.71 of this Code.5    (k-5) On and after July 1, 2026, the expulsion of children 6enrolled in programs funded under Section 15-25 of the 7Department of Early Childhood Act is subject to the 8requirements of paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 915-30 of the Department of Early Childhood Act. 10    (l) An in-school suspension program provided by a school 11district for any students in kindergarten through grade 12 may 12focus on promoting non-violent conflict resolution and 13positive interaction with other students and school personnel. 14A school district may employ a school social worker or a 15licensed mental health professional to oversee an in-school 16suspension program in kindergarten through grade 12.17(Source: P.A. 102-466, eff. 7-1-25; 102-539, eff. 8-20-21; 18102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-594, eff. 6-25-24; 103-896, eff. 198-9-24; revised 9-25-24.) 20    (105 ILCS 5/26-12)  (from Ch. 122, par. 26-12)21    Sec. 26-12. Punitive action. 22    (a) No punitive action, including out-of-school 23suspensions, expulsions, or court action, shall be taken 24against truant minors for such truancy unless appropriate and 25available supportive services and other school resources have   HB2502- 31 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1been provided to the student. Notwithstanding the provisions 2of Section 10-22.6 of this Code, a truant minor may not be 3expelled for nonattendance unless he or she has accrued 15 4consecutive days of absences without valid cause and the 5student cannot be located by the school district or the school 6district has located the student but cannot, after exhausting 7all available supportive services, compel the student to 8return to school.9    (b) School personnel A school district may not refer a 10truant, chronic truant, or truant minor to any other local 11public entity, as defined under Section 1-206 of the Local 12Governmental and Governmental Employees Tort Immunity Act, 13school resource officer, as defined in Section 10-20.68 of 14this Code, or peace officer, as defined in Section 2-13 of the 15Criminal Code of 2012, for that local public entity, school 16resource officer, or peace officer to issue the child a fine or 17a fee as punishment for his or her truancy.18    (c) A school district may refer any person having custody 19or control of a truant, chronic truant, or truant minor to any 20other local public entity, as defined under Section 1-206 of 21the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees Tort 22Immunity Act, for that local public entity to issue the person 23a fine or fee for the child's truancy only if the school 24district's truant officer, regional office of education, or 25intermediate service center has been notified of the truant 26behavior and the school district, regional office of   HB2502- 32 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1education, or intermediate service center has offered all 2appropriate and available supportive services and other school 3resources to the child. Before a school district may refer a 4person having custody or control of a child to a municipality, 5as defined under Section 1-1-2 of the Illinois Municipal Code, 6the school district must provide the following appropriate and 7available services:8        (1) For any child who is a homeless child, as defined 9    under Section 1-5 of the Education for Homeless Children 10    Act, a meeting between the child, the person having 11    custody or control of the child, relevant school 12    personnel, and a homeless liaison to discuss any barriers 13    to the child's attendance due to the child's transitional 14    living situation and to construct a plan that removes 15    these barriers.16        (2) For any child with a documented disability, a 17    meeting between the child, the person having custody or 18    control of the child, and relevant school personnel to 19    review the child's current needs and address the 20    appropriateness of the child's placement and services. For 21    any child subject to Article 14 of this Code, this meeting 22    shall be an individualized education program meeting and 23    shall include relevant members of the individualized 24    education program team. For any child with a disability 25    under Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 26    1973 (29 U.S.C. 794), this meeting shall be a Section 504   HB2502- 33 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1    plan review and include relevant members of the Section 2    504 plan team.3        (3) For any child currently being evaluated by a 4    school district for a disability or for whom the school 5    has a basis of knowledge that the child is a child with a 6    disability under 20 U.S.C. 1415(k)(5), the completion of 7    the evaluation and determination of the child's 8    eligibility for special education services.9    (d) Before a school district may refer a person having 10custody or control of a child to a local public entity under 11this Section, the school district must document any 12appropriate and available supportive services offered to the 13child. In the event a meeting under this Section does not 14occur, a school district must have documentation that it made 15reasonable efforts to convene the meeting at a mutually 16convenient time and date for the school district and the 17person having custody or control of the child and, but for the 18conduct of that person, the meeting would have occurred. 19(Source: P.A. 100-810, eff. 1-1-19; 100-825, eff. 8-13-18; 20101-81, eff. 7-12-19.) 21    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 22changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 23that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 24represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 25not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes   HB2502- 34 -LRB104 06246 LNS 16281 b1made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 2Public Act. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.